Massachusetts, session 194th, H2977.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Notwithstanding any general or special law, rule or regulation to the contrary, the
teachers’ retirement system shall credit Wendy Lopriore, a member of the teachers’ retirement
system, with creditable service for the service she rendered at Bristol Community College for the
period from July 1995 to August 1997, inclusive, for the purpose of determining her
superannuation retirement allowance pursuant to paragraph (a) of subdivision (2) of section 5 of
chapter 32 of the General Laws. Before the date that any retirement allowance becomes effective
for Wendy Lopriore, she shall pay into the annuity savings fund of the teachers’ retirement
system in 1 sum or installments, upon such terms and conditions as the teachers’ retirement
board may prescribe, an amount equal to that which would have been withheld as regular
deductions from her regular compensation for such previous service, plus buyback interest.
of 1